District of Columbia statutes.
29-801.04

Nature, purpose, and duration of limited liability company.

(a)

A limited liability company is an entity distinct from its member or members.

(b)

A limited liability company may have any lawful purpose, regardless of whether for profit.

(c)

A limited liability company shall have perpetual duration.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(h)(2)(C), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “member or members” for “members” in (a).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 104 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.